Colorado, session 2026A, SB119.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-13.5-502, amend
(1) as follows:
1-13.5-502. Notice of election.
(1) The designated election official, at least twenty days before
each local government election, shall give written notice of the election
stating the date of the election and the location and hours during which
the polls will be open; the date ballots have or may be mailed if the
election is conducted by mail ballot; THE PROCEDURE FOR ACCESSING THE
ELECTRONIC TRANSMISSION SYSTEM IF THE ELECTION IS TO BE CONDUCTED
BY ELECTRONIC BALLOT RETURN; mail ballot drop-off locations; names of
the officers to be elected and any ballot issues and ballot questions to be
voted upon; and the names of those candidates whose nominations have
been certified to the designated election official, which listing must be as
nearly as possible in the form in which such nominations will appear
upon the official ballot. For an independent mail ballot election, the
notice does not need to include the text of the ballot issues or ballot
-2- SB26-119

questions. A copy of the notice must be posted until after the election in
a conspicuous place in the office of the designated election official. A
copy of the notice must be mailed or sent via electronic mail to the county
clerk and recorder.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 1-13.5-606.5 as
follows:
1-13.5-606.5. Electronic ballot return - qualified electronic
transmission system - requirements - rules - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "ELECTRONIC BALLOT RETURN" MEANS A SYSTEM THAT
ALLOWS AN ELIGIBLE ELECTOR TO CAST AND RETURN A BALLOT
ELECTRONICALLY TO THE DESIGNATED ELECTION OFFICIAL.
(b) "ELECTRONIC TRANSMISSION SYSTEM" MEANS AN ELECTRONIC
SYSTEM THAT PROVIDES FOR THE SECURE TRANSMISSION OF ELECTRONIC
BALLOT RETURNS.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS ARTICLE 13.5 TO
THE CONTRARY, THE GOVERNING BODY OF A LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY
DETERMINE THAT AN ELECTION SHALL BE CONDUCTED BY ELECTRONIC
BALLOT RETURN IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SECTION AND MAY SPECIFY THE ELECTRONIC TRANSMISSION SYSTEM TO BE
USED BY THE DESIGNATED ELECTION OFFICIAL FOR THE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT.
(3) THE DESIGNATED ELECTION OFFICIAL FOR A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT SHALL CONDUCT AN ELECTRONIC BALLOT RETURN ELECTION
USING AN ELECTRONIC TRANSMISSION SYSTEM AS SPECIFIED BY THE
GOVERNING BODY OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
-3- SB26-119

(2) OF THIS SECTION AND THAT MEETS THE QUALIFICATIONS OF THIS
SECTION.
(4) TO QUALIFY FOR THE USE OF ELECTRONIC BALLOT RETURN IN
AN ELECTION PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, AN ELECTRONIC TRANSMISSION
SYSTEM MUST:
(a) PROVIDE FOR SECURE IDENTIFICATION AND AUTHENTICATION;
(b) TRANSMIT ENCRYPTED INFORMATION OVER A SECURE
NETWORK;
(c) PROTECT THE PRIVACY, ANONYMITY, AND INTEGRITY OF EACH
ELECTOR'S BALLOT;
(d) PROTECT AGAINST ABUSE; AND
(e) PROVIDE ANY OTHER SECURITY, INTEGRITY, AUDITABILITY, OR
ACCESSIBILITY MEASURE IDENTIFIED IN THE RULES OF THE SECRETARY OF
STATE AS NECESSARY FOR THE QUALIFICATION OF AN ELECTRONIC
TRANSMISSION SYSTEM TO BE USED FOR ELECTRONIC BALLOT RETURN.
(5) (a) THE DESIGNATED ELECTION OFFICIAL FOR A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT THAT IS USING ELECTRONIC BALLOT RETURN SHALL ENSURE
THAT EACH BALLOT RECEIVED THROUGH THE QUALIFIED ELECTRONIC
TRANSMISSION SYSTEM IS ANONYMOUSLY TRANSCRIBED TO A PAPER
BALLOT.
(b) THE DESIGNATED ELECTION OFFICIAL, OR THE DESIGNATED
ELECTION OFFICIAL'S DESIGNEE, SHALL SECURE, COUNT, MAINTAIN, AND
STORE THE PAPER BALLOTS TRANSCRIBED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(5)(a) OF THIS SECTION IN THE SAME MANNER AS IS REQUIRED FOR ALL
BALLOTS PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 13.5.
(6) ANY ELECTRONIC DATA GENERATED BY AN ELECTOR USING A
QUALIFIED ELECTRONIC TRANSMISSION SYSTEM FOR ELECTRONIC BALLOT
-4- SB26-119

RETURN IS CONFIDENTIAL AND SHALL NOT BE USED FOR ANY PURPOSE
OTHER THAN VOTER PARTICIPATION STATISTICS.
(7) THE SECRETARY OF STATE SHALL PUBLISH GUIDANCE AND MAY
ADOPT RULES AS NECESSARY TO FURTHER SPECIFY THE QUALIFICATIONS
OF AN ELECTRONIC TRANSMISSION SYSTEM FOR ELECTRONIC BALLOT
RETURN, INCLUDING RECOMMENDED MINIMUM SECURITY STANDARDS,
VOTER PRIVACY STANDARDS, SYSTEM AUDITING STANDARDS, AND
VERIFICATION TECHNOLOGY REQUIREMENTS.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 31-10-501, amend
(1) as follows:
31-10-501. Clerk to give notice.
(1) The clerk, at least ten days before each municipal election,
shall give written or printed notice of the election stating the date of the
election and the hours during which the polls will be open, designating
the polling place of each precinct, DESCRIBING THE PROCEDURE FOR
ACCESSING THE ELECTRONIC TRANSMISSION SYSTEM IF THE ELECTION IS TO
BE CONDUCTED BY ELECTRONIC BALLOT RETURN, stating the qualifications
of persons to vote in the election, naming the officers to be elected and
the questions to be voted upon, and listing the names of those candidates
whose nominations have been certified to him THE CLERK, which listing
shall be as nearly as possible in the form in which such THE nominations
shall appear upon the official ballot with reference to wards where
applicable. A copy of such THE notice shall be posted until after the
election in a conspicuous place in the office of the clerk.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 31-10-607.5 as
follows:
31-10-607.5. Electronic ballot return - qualified electronic
-5- SB26-119

transmission system - requirements - rules - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "ELECTRONIC BALLOT RETURN" MEANS A SYSTEM THAT
ALLOWS AN ELIGIBLE ELECTOR TO CAST AND RETURN A BALLOT
ELECTRONICALLY TO THE DESIGNATED ELECTION OFFICIAL.
(b) "ELECTRONIC TRANSMISSION SYSTEM" MEANS AN ELECTRONIC
SYSTEM THAT PROVIDES FOR THE SECURE TRANSMISSION OF ELECTRONIC
BALLOT RETURNS.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS ARTICLE 10 TO THE
CONTRARY, THE GOVERNING BODY OF A MUNICIPALITY MAY DETERMINE
THAT AN ELECTION SHALL BE CONDUCTED BY ELECTRONIC BALLOT
RETURN IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION AND
MAY SPECIFY THE ELECTRONIC TRANSMISSION SYSTEM TO BE USED BY THE
DESIGNATED ELECTION OFFICIAL FOR THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT.
(3) THE CLERK FOR A MUNICIPALITY SHALL CONDUCT AN
ELECTRONIC BALLOT RETURN ELECTION USING AN ELECTRONIC
TRANSMISSION SYSTEM AS SPECIFIED BY THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE
MUNICIPALITY PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION AND THAT
MEETS THE QUALIFICATIONS OF THIS SECTION.
(4) TO QUALIFY FOR THE USE OF ELECTRONIC BALLOT RETURN IN
AN ELECTION PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, AN ELECTRONIC TRANSMISSION
SYSTEM MUST:
(a) PROVIDE FOR SECURE IDENTIFICATION AND AUTHENTICATION;
(b) TRANSMIT ENCRYPTED INFORMATION OVER A SECURE
NETWORK;
(c) PROTECT THE PRIVACY, ANONYMITY, AND INTEGRITY OF EACH
-6- SB26-119

ELECTOR'S BALLOT;
(d) PROTECT AGAINST ABUSE; AND
(e) PROVIDE ANY OTHER SECURITY, INTEGRITY, AUDITABILITY, OR
ACCESSIBILITY MEASURE IDENTIFIED IN THE RULES OF THE SECRETARY OF
STATE AS NECESSARY FOR THE QUALIFICATION OF AN ELECTRONIC
TRANSMISSION SYSTEM TO BE USED FOR ELECTRONIC BALLOT RETURN.
(5) (a) THE CLERK FOR A MUNICIPALITY THAT IS USING ELECTRONIC
BALLOT RETURN SHALL ENSURE THAT EACH BALLOT RECEIVED THROUGH
THE QUALIFIED ELECTRONIC TRANSMISSION SYSTEM IS ANONYMOUSLY
TRANSCRIBED TO A PAPER BALLOT.
(b) THE CLERK, OR THE CLERK'S DESIGNEE, SHALL SECURE, COUNT,
MAINTAIN, AND STORE THE PAPER BALLOTS TRANSCRIBED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (5)(a) OF THIS SECTION IN THE SAME MANNER AS IS REQUIRED
FOR ALL BALLOTS PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 10.
(6) ANY ELECTRONIC DATA GENERATED BY AN ELECTOR USING A
QUALIFIED ELECTRONIC TRANSMISSION SYSTEM FOR ELECTRONIC BALLOT
RETURN IS CONFIDENTIAL AND SHALL NOT BE USED FOR ANY PURPOSE
OTHER THAN VOTER PARTICIPATION STATISTICS.
(7) THE SECRETARY OF STATE SHALL PUBLISH GUIDANCE AND MAY
ADOPT RULES, AS NECESSARY, TO FURTHER SPECIFY THE QUALIFICATIONS
OF AN ELECTRONIC TRANSMISSION SYSTEM FOR ELECTRONIC BALLOT
RETURN, INCLUDING RECOMMENDED MINIMUM SECURITY STANDARDS,
VOTER PRIVACY STANDARDS, SYSTEM AUDITING STANDARDS, AND
VERIFICATION TECHNOLOGY REQUIREMENTS.
SECTION 5. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
-7- SB26-119

12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-8- SB26-119